Colorado statutes. TITLE 42 VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC
PART 2 LICENSE PLATES
42-3-213. License plates - military veterans - rules - retirement.

The department shall issue one or more sets of license plates to the following persons who own a truck that does not exceed sixteen thousand pounds empty weight, a passenger car, a motorcycle, or a noncommercial or recreational vehicle:

A recipient of the purple heart;

A former prisoner of war;

An honorably discharged or retired veteran of the armed forces of the United States;

A disabled veteran of the armed forces of the United States;

A survivor of the attack on Pearl Harbor;

A recipient of the medal of honor;

An honorably discharged, retired, reserve, or active member of the United States Marine Corps;

A veteran of the Korean war;

A recipient of a military award for valor;

A veteran of the Vietnam war;

An honorably discharged, retired, reserve, or active member of the United States Army;

Effective July 1, 2006, an honorably discharged, retired, reserve, or active member of the United States Navy;

A recipient of a bronze star medal;

The current or past spouse, child, sibling, grandparent, or parent of a person who died in the line of duty while serving in the armed forces;

An honorably discharged, retired, reserve, auxiliary, or active member of the United States Coast Guard;

A serving member or honorably discharged or retired member of any component of the United States Air Force;

An honorably discharged, retired, reserve, or active member of the special forces of the United States armed forces;

A person who supports the North American aerospace defense command;

On or after January 1, 2009, a person who supports the United States Army fourth infantry division;

A veteran of the Afghanistan war;

A veteran of the Iraq war;

A veteran of world war II;

A veteran of operation desert shield or desert storm;

A recipient of the distinguished flying cross;

An honorably discharged, retired, reserve, or active member of the Navy SEALs;

A natural person who supports the civil air patrol;

A natural person who supports the USS Colorado (SSN 788);

An honorably discharged, retired, reserve, or active member of the 10th mountain division of the United States Army;

An honorably discharged, retired, reserve, or active member of a submarine crew of the United States Navy; or

An honorably discharged or retired woman veteran of the United States armed forces.

Except as provided in subparagraph (II) of this paragraph (b), the amount of taxes and fees for license plates issued under this section are the same as that specified for regular motor vehicle registration plus an additional one-time issuance or replacement fee. The additional one-time fee is twenty-five dollars and shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit it to the highway users tax fund for allocation and expenditure as specified in section 43-4-205 (5.5)(b), C.R.S.

Notwithstanding subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (b):

No fee shall be charged for one set of prisoner of war special license plates issued pursuant to subsection (3) of this section for a passenger car, a truck, a motorcycle, or a noncommercial or recreational vehicle.

No fee shall be charged for one set of disabled veteran license plates issued under subsection (5) of this section for a passenger car, truck, motorcycle, or noncommercial or recreational vehicle.

No fee shall be charged for one set of medal of honor special license plates issued pursuant to subsection (7) of this section for a passenger car, a truck, a motorcycle, or a noncommercial or recreational vehicle.

No fee shall be charged for one set of purple heart special license plates issued pursuant to subsection (2) of this section.

No fee shall be charged for one set of military valor special license plates issued pursuant to subsection (10) of this section.

No fee shall be charged for one set of survivors of the attack on Pearl Harbor special license plates issued pursuant to subsection (6) of this section.

The one-time issuance fee imposed pursuant to subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (b) shall not be charged for one set, per applicant, of fallen service member special license plates issued pursuant to subsection (15) of this section.

The department shall not charge the one-time issuance fee imposed pursuant to subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (b) for one set, per applicant, of world war II special license plates issued pursuant to subsection (23) of this section.

The department shall not charge a fee for one set of distinguished flying cross special license plates issued under subsection (25) of this section if the cross was awarded for valor.

Except as provided in subparagraphs (IV) and (V) of this paragraph (b), the fees collected pursuant to this paragraph (b) shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the fees to the highway users tax fund.

One dollar of each additional fee collected from purchasers of license plates issued under subsections (4) and (5) of this section shall be retained by the authorized agent, and one dollar and fifteen cents of each additional fee shall be credited to the special purpose account established under section 42-1-211.

One dollar of each additional fee collected from purchasers of license plates issued under subsection (8) of this section shall be retained by the authorized agent.

All applications for the license plates described in this section shall be made directly to the department and shall include such information as the department may require.

The executive director of the department may prepare such special forms and issue such rules as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.

Notwithstanding the weight limitation imposed by paragraph (a) of this subsection (1), a natural person eligible for a military veteran special license plate issued pursuant to this section may apply for such a license plate for a motor home, as defined in section 42-1-102 (57), upon the payment of the fees or taxes required by this article.

A person who meets the conditions stated in subparagraph (XIV) of paragraph (a) of this subsection (1) is authorized to be issued a fallen service member special license plate. Except as provided by sub-subparagraph (G) of subparagraph (II) of paragraph (b) of this subsection (1), this paragraph (f) shall not be construed to authorize the spouse, child, sibling, grandparent, or parent to receive a license plate without paying the applicable fees or if such plate signifies more than that the deceased served in a branch of the armed forces.

The department shall issue a license plate authorized under this section for a motor vehicle owned by a trust if:

The trust is created for the benefit of a natural person who is qualified to receive the license plate under paragraph (a) of this subsection (1); and

The trust name includes a natural person who is qualified to receive the license plate under paragraph (a) of this subsection (1).

If an applicant for a military license plate issued under this section demonstrates a physical impairment affecting mobility under the standards provided in section 42-3-204 (1), the department shall issue a military license plate with an additional identifying figure, as defined in section 42-3-204 (1)(e), to indicate that the vehicle is authorized to transport a person who is eligible to use reserved parking under section 42-4-1208.

Recipient of a purple heart.

The purple heart special license plate shall be designed to indicate that an owner of a motor vehicle to which such license plate is attached is a recipient of the purple heart.

A natural person who has been awarded a purple heart for wounds received in combat at the hands of an enemy of the United States may use a purple heart special license plate. When applying for such a license plate, the applicant shall submit to the department a letter of verification from the appropriate branch of the armed forces of the United States that the applicant has been awarded a purple heart.

Former prisoner of war.

The former prisoner of war special license plate shall be designed to indicate that an owner of a motor vehicle to which such license plate is attached is a former prisoner of war.

A natural person who, while serving in the armed forces of the United States, was incarcerated by an enemy of the United States during a period of conflict with the United States may use the former prisoner of war special license plate.

If a deceased former prisoner of war was authorized under this section to use a former prisoner of war special license plate, the surviving spouse of such former prisoner of war may apply to the department to retain any set or sets of such special plates that such former prisoner of war had obtained. Such surviving spouse shall be eligible to use such special plates upon the payment of any fees or taxes required by this article.

Honorably discharged or retired veteran of the U.S. armed forces.

The veteran of the United States armed forces special license plate shall indicate that an owner of a motor vehicle to which such plate is attached is a veteran of the armed forces of the United States.

A natural person who has received an honorable discharge or is retired from a branch of the armed services of the United States may use a veteran of the United States armed forces special license plate. When applying for such a license plate, an applicant shall submit as proof of honorable discharge either a department of defense form 214 or an honorable discharge from an armed forces branch of the United States.

Disabled veterans.

The disabled veteran license plate shall indicate that the owner of the motor vehicle to which the license plate is attached is a disabled veteran of the United States armed forces.

Repealed.

A natural person who has received an honorable discharge from a branch of the armed services of the United States and meets the requirements of section 42-3-304 (3)(a) may use a disabled veteran license plate. When applying for such a license plate, the applicant shall submit proof of honorable discharge from an armed forces branch of the United States.

License plates qualifying for the exemption granted in sub-subparagraph (B) of subparagraph (II) of paragraph (b) of subsection (1) of this section shall be issued only by the department and shall bear the inscription "D.V.", and a separate number series shall be used for such license plates. Additional license plates bearing such inscription may be issued by the department to eligible persons upon the payment of any fees or taxes required by this article.

Survivors of the attack on Pearl Harbor.

The survivors of the attack on Pearl Harbor special license plates shall be designed to indicate that the owner of the motor vehicle to which such license plates are attached is a survivor of the attack on Pearl Harbor.

Any natural person may use a survivors of the attack on Pearl Harbor special license plate if such person:

Was a member of the United States armed forces on December 7, 1941;

Was on station on December 7, 1941, during the hours of 7:55 a.m. to 9:45 a.m. Hawaii time at Pearl Harbor, the island of Oahu, or offshore at a distance not to exceed three miles therefrom;

Received an honorable discharge from the United States armed forces; and

Holds a current membership in a national organization of survivors of the attack on Pearl Harbor.

Recipient of a medal of honor.

The department shall design the medal of honor special license plate to indicate that an owner of a motor vehicle to which such license plate is attached is a recipient of the medal of honor.

A natural person who has been awarded a medal of honor may use a medal of honor special license plate. When applying for such a license plate, the applicant shall submit to the department a letter of verification from the appropriate branch of the armed forces of the United States that the applicant has been awarded a medal of honor.

Honorably discharged, retired veteran, or active member of the U.S. Marine Corps.

The United States Marine Corps special license plate shall indicate that an owner of a motor vehicle to which such plate is attached is a veteran, reserve member, or an active member of the United States Marine Corps.

A natural person who has received an honorable discharge, is retired, or is an active or reserve member of the United States Marine Corps may use a United States Marine Corps special license plate. When applying for such a license plate, an applicant shall submit proof of an honorable discharge or proof that the applicant is currently an active or reserve member of the United States Marine Corps.

Veteran of the Korean war.

The veteran of the Korean war special license plate shall be designed to indicate that the owner of the motor vehicle to which such license plate is attached is a veteran of the Korean war.

A natural person may use a veteran of the Korean war special license plate if such person was a member of the United States armed forces between June 27, 1950, and January 31, 1955.

Recipient of a military valor award.

The military valor special license plate shall be designed to indicate that an owner of a motor vehicle bearing such license plate has received a military award for valor.

A natural person who has been awarded a military award for valor may use a military valor special license plate. When applying for such a license plate, the applicant shall submit to the department a copy of the military order awarding the military award for valor.

For the purposes of this section,"military award for valor" or "military valor award" means the following awards:

Navy cross;

Distinguished service cross;

Air Force cross; or

Silver star.

Veteran of the Vietnam war.

The veteran of the Vietnam war special license plate shall be designed to indicate that the owner of the motor vehicle to which such license plate is attached is a veteran of the Vietnam war.

A natural person may use a veteran of the Vietnam war special license plate if the person was a member of the United States armed services between August 7, 1964, and May 7, 1975.

The department or an authorized agent shall not issue a veteran of the Vietnam war special license plate to an applicant until the applicant provides a DD214 form issued by the United States government or other evidence sufficient to demonstrate that the applicant is a veteran of the armed services who served between August 7, 1964, and May 7, 1975.

Honorably discharged, retired veteran, reserve, or active member of the United States Army.

The United States Army special license plate shall be designed to indicate that the owner of the motor vehicle to which such license plate is attached is an honorably discharged, retired, reserve, or active member of the United States Army.

A natural person may use a United States Army special license plate if such person is an honorably discharged, retired, reserve, or active member of the United States Army.

The department or an authorized agent shall not issue an United States Army special license plate to an applicant until the applicant provides a DD214 form issued by the United States government or other evidence sufficient to demonstrate that the applicant is an honorably discharged, retired, reserve, or active member of the United States Army.

Repealed.

Honorably discharged, retired veteran, or active member of the United States Navy.

The United States Navy special license plate shall indicate that an owner of a motor vehicle to which such plate is attached is a veteran, a reserve member, or an active member of the United States Navy.

A natural person who has received an honorable discharge, is retired, or is an active or reserve member of the United States Navy shall be authorized to use a United States Navy special license plate. When applying for such a license plate, an applicant shall submit a DD214 form issued by the United States government or other evidence sufficient to demonstrate that the applicant has an honorable discharge or proof that the applicant is currently an active or reserve member of the United States Navy.

This subsection (13) shall take effect July 1, 2006.

Recipient of a bronze star medal.

The bronze star special license plate shall be designed to indicate that an owner of a motor vehicle bearing such license plate has received a bronze star medal. The bronze star for valor license plate shall be designed to indicate that an owner of a motor vehicle bearing such license plate has received the bronze star medal with the "V" for valor distinction.

On or after January 1, 2007, a natural person who has been awarded a bronze star may use a bronze star special license plate. A natural person who has been awarded a bronze star with the "V" for valor distinction may use a bronze star for valor special license plate. When applying for such a license plate, the applicant shall submit to the department a copy of the military order awarding the bronze star and a DD214 form issued by the United States government showing that the award was received by the applicant.

Fallen service member special license plate.

The fallen service member special license plate shall be designed to indicate that the owner of the motor vehicle to which the plate is attached is a family member of a person who died in the line of duty while serving in the armed forces. The plate shall bear the word "fallen" and the title of a person who serves in the branch of the armed forces in which the deceased served.

A person who meets the conditions stated in subparagraph (XIV) of paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of this section may use a fallen service member special license plate. The department or an authorized agent shall not issue a fallen service member special license plate to an applicant until the applicant provides a DD214 form issued by the United States government and other evidence sufficient to demonstrate that the applicant is qualified to be issued the plate as determined by the department.

Honorably discharged, retired veteran, auxiliary, or active member of the United States Coast Guard.

The United States Coast Guard special license plate shall indicate that an owner of a motor vehicle to which such plate is attached is a veteran, a reserve member, an auxiliary member, or an active member of the United States Coast Guard.

On or after January 1, 2008, a natural person who has received an honorable discharge, is retired, or is an active, auxiliary, or reserve member of the United States Coast Guard shall be authorized to use a United States Coast Guard special license plate.

When applying for such a license plate, an applicant shall submit a DD214 form issued by the United States government or other evidence sufficient to demonstrate that the applicant has an honorable discharge or proof that the applicant is currently an active, auxiliary, or reserve member of the United States Coast Guard.

Honorably discharged, retired veteran, or active member of the United States Air Force.

Beginning January 1, 2008, the United States Air Force special license plate shall indicate that an owner of a motor vehicle to which such plate is attached is a veteran, reserve member, or active member of the United States Air Force.

A natural person who has received an honorable discharge, is retired, or is an active or reserve member of any component of the United States Air Force shall be authorized to use a United States Air Force special license plate.

When applying for such a license plate, an applicant shall submit a DD214 form issued by the United States government or other evidence sufficient to demonstrate that the applicant is a veteran, reserve member, or active member of any component of the United States Air Force.

Honorably discharged, retired veteran, or active member of the United States Army special forces.

The United States Army special forces license plate shall indicate that an owner of a motor vehicle to which such plate is attached is a veteran, a reserve member, or an active member of the special forces of the United States Army.

Beginning January 1, 2008, a natural person who has received an honorable discharge or is an active or reserve member of the United States Army special forces may use a United States Army special forces license plate. When applying for such a license plate, an applicant shall submit:

Proof of an honorable discharge or retirement or proof that the applicant is currently an active or reserve member of the United States Army special forces;

Orders or a DD214 form that shows an awarded prefix "3" or a designation of "5G", 18/180 series MOS, special forces tab, OSS, or UNPIK-8240.

North American aerospace defense command commemorative special license plate.

The North American aerospace defense command commemorative special license plate shall be designed to indicate that the owner of the motor vehicle to which the license plate is attached wishes to commemorate the North American aerospace defense command's fiftieth anniversary.

The department shall issue North American aerospace defense command commemorative special license plates until January 1, 2010, or when the available inventory is depleted, whichever is later. This paragraph (b) shall not be deemed to prohibit the use of the plate after January 1, 2010, nor to require the plate to be recalled by the department.

Honorably discharged, retired veteran, reserve, or active member of the United States Army - fourth infantry division. The United States Army fourth infantry division special license plate shall be designed to indicate that the owner of the motor vehicle to which such license plate is attached supports the United States Army fourth infantry division.

Veteran of the Afghanistan war.

The veteran of the Afghanistan war special license plate shall be designed to indicate that the owner of the motor vehicle to which such license plate is attached is a veteran of the Afghanistan war.

Effective January 1, 2011, a natural person may use a veteran of the Afghanistan war special license plate if such person was a member of the United States armed services between October 7, 2001, and the end of the conflict.

The department or an authorized agent shall not issue a veteran of the Afghanistan war special license plate to an applicant until the applicant provides a DD214 form issued by the United States government or other evidence sufficient to demonstrate that the applicant is a veteran of the armed services who served between October 7, 2001, and the end of the conflict.

Veteran of the Iraq war.

The veteran of the Iraq war special license plate shall be designed to indicate that the owner of the motor vehicle to which such license plate is attached is a veteran of the Iraq war.

Effective January 1, 2011, a natural person may use a veteran of the Iraq war special license plate if such person was a member of the United States armed services between March 20, 2003, and the end of the conflict.

The department or an authorized agent shall not issue a veteran of the Iraq war special license plate to an applicant until the applicant provides a DD214 form issued by the United States government or other evidence sufficient to demonstrate that the applicant is a veteran of the armed services who served between March 20, 2003, and the end of the conflict.

Veteran of world war II.

The department shall design the veteran of world war II special license plate to indicate that the owner of the motor vehicle to which the license plate is attached is a veteran of world war II.

Effective January 1, 2012, a natural person may use a world war II special license plate if the person was a member of the United States armed services between September 16, 1940, and July 25, 1947.

The department or an authorized agent shall not issue a world war II special license plate to an applicant until the applicant provides a DD214 form issued by the United States government or other evidence sufficient to demonstrate that the applicant is a veteran of the armed services who served between September 16, 1940, and July 25, 1947.

Veteran of operation desert shield or desert storm.

The department shall design the veteran of operation desert shield or desert storm license plate to indicate that the owner of the motor vehicle to which the license plate is attached is a veteran of operation desert shield or desert storm.

Effective January 1, 2013, a natural person may use an operation desert shield or desert storm license plate if the person was a member of the United States armed services between August 2, 1990, and February 28, 1991.

The department or an authorized agent shall not issue an operation desert shield or desert storm license plate to an applicant until the applicant provides a DD214 form issued by the United States government or other evidence sufficient to demonstrate that the applicant is a veteran of the armed services who served between August 2, 1990, and February 28, 1991.

Recipient of a distinguished flying cross.

The department shall design a special license plate to indicate that the owner of a motor vehicle to which the license plate is attached has received the distinguished flying cross.

A natural person who has been awarded a distinguished flying cross may use a distinguished flying cross special license plate. When applying for the license plate, the applicant shall submit to the department a copy of the military order awarding the distinguished flying cross or any other evidence the department may accept.

Honorably discharged, retired veteran, or active member of the Navy SEALs.

The department shall design the Navy SEAL license plate to indicate that an owner of a motor vehicle to which the plate is attached is a veteran, a reserve member, or an active member of the United States Navy SEALs.

A natural person who has received an honorable discharge, is retired, or is an active or reserve member of the United States Navy SEALs may use a United States Navy SEALs license plate. To qualify for the license plate, an applicant must submit a DD214 form issued by the United States government and a certification from the UDT/SEAL association, inc., the Rocky Mountain chapter of the UDT/SEAL association, inc., or a successor organization that the applicant has an honorable discharge from, is retired from, or is currently an active or reserve member of the Navy SEALs.

Member of the civil air patrol.

The department of military affairs may design the civil air patrol license plate if the design conforms with standards established by the department and indicates that an owner of a motor vehicle to which the plate is attached supports the civil air patrol.

A natural person who supports the civil air patrol may use a civil air patrol license plate.

USS Colorado.

The department of military affairs may design the USS Colorado (SSN 788) license plate if the design conforms with standards established by the department. The plate must indicate that an owner of a motor vehicle to which the plate is attached supports the USS Colorado submarine.

A natural person who supports the USS Colorado (SSN 788) may use USS Colorado license plate.

Veteran, reserve member, or active member of the 10th mountain division of the United States Army.

The department shall design the "10th mountain division" license plate to indicate that an owner of a motor vehicle to which the plate is attached is a veteran, a reserve member, or an active member of the 10th mountain division of the United States Army.

A natural person who meets the conditions established in subparagraph (XXVIII) of paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of this section may use a "10th mountain division" license plate. To qualify for the license plate, an applicant must submit a DD214 form issued by the United States government or other evidence sufficient to demonstrate that the applicant is a veteran, a reserve member, or an active member of the 10th mountain division of the United States Army.

By January 1, 2016, the department shall require each holder of a "10th mountain division" license plate to either submit the evidence of qualification required by paragraph (b) of this subsection (29) or return the plate to the department.

Honorably discharged, retired veteran, or reserve or active member of the United States Navy submarine service.

Beginning January 1, 2019, the department shall design the submarine service license plate to indicate that an owner of a motor vehicle to which the plate is attached is a veteran, reserve member, or active member of the submarine service of the United States Navy.

A natural person who has received an honorable discharge from, is retired from, or is an active or reserve member of the submarine service may use a submarine service license plate.

To qualify for a submarine service license plate, an applicant must submit a DD214 form issued by the United States government or other evidence sufficient to demonstrate that the applicant is a veteran, reserve member, or active member of the submarine service of the United States Navy.

Honorably discharged or retired woman veteran of the United States armed forces.

The United States woman veteran license plate must indicate that an owner of a motor vehicle to which the plate is attached is a woman veteran of the United States armed forces.

A woman who has received an honorable discharge from, or is retired from, the United States armed forces is authorized to use a United States woman veteran license plate. When applying for the license plate, an applicant must submit a DD214 form issued by the United States government or other evidence sufficient to demonstrate that the applicant is a woman and has an honorable discharge from, or is retired from, the United States armed forces.

The department shall begin issuing the United States woman veteran license plate on the earlier of January 1, 2020, or when the department is able to begin issuing the plate.

Source:

L. 2005:

(1)(b)(I) amended, p. 143, § 12, effective April 5; (1)(a)(XII) and (13) added, p. 664, §§ 1, 2, effective August 8; entire article amended with relocations, p. 1118, § 2, effective August 8.

L. 2006:

(1)(a)(XIII) and (14) added, p. 1685, §§ 1, 2, effective August 7; IP(1)(a) amended and (1)(a)(XIV), (1)(f), and (15) added, pp. 1752, 1753, §§ 1, 2, 3, effective January 1, 2007; (1)(b)(II)(E) and (1)(b)(II)(F) added, p. 920, § 1, effective January 1, 2007.

L. 2007:

(1)(a)(XIV) and (1)(f) amended and (1)(a)(XVII), (1)(b)(II)(G), and (18) added, pp. 1320, 1321, §§ 1, 4, 3, 2, effective August 3; (1)(a)(XV) and (16) added, p. 666, §§ 1, 2, effective August 3; (1)(a)(XVI) and (17) added, p. 2088, §§ 1, 2, effective August 3; (9)(b) amended, p. 433, § 1, effective August 3.

L. 2008:

(1)(a)(XVIII) and (19) added, p. 912, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1; (1)(a)(XIX) and (20) added, p. 1026, §§ 1, 2, effective August 5; (1)(g) added, p. 2273, § 5, effective January 1, 2009.

L. 2010:

(1)(a)(XX), (1)(a)(XXI), (21), and (22) added, (HB 10-1139), ch. 236, p. 1032, §§ 1, 2, effective August 11; (5)(a)(II) amended, (HB 10-1019), ch. 400, p. 1930, § 7, effective January 1, 2011.

L. 2011:

(1)(a)(XXII), (1)(b)(II)(H), and (23) added, (SB 11-037), ch. 126, p. 392, §§ 1, 2, 3, effective August 10.

L. 2012:

(1)(a)(XXI) and (1)(a)(XXII) amended and (1)(a)(XXIII) and (24) added, (HB 12-1162), ch. 150, p. 539, § 1, effective August 8; (1)(a)(XXIV) and (25) added, (HB 12-1153), ch. 145, p. 524, § 1, effective August 8.

L. 2013:

(1)(a)(XXV) and (26) added, (SB 13-120), ch. 387, p. 2256, § 1, effective August 7; (1)(a)(XXVI) and (27) added, (SB 13-060), ch. 213, p. 890, § 1, effective August 7.

L. 2014:

IP(1)(a), (1)(b)(I), (1)(b)(II)(B), (1)(b)(IV), (1)(b)(V), (1)(c), (1)(g), (5)(a), and (5)(b) amended, (HB 14-1029), ch. 252, p. 1004, § 4, effective July 1; (1)(a)(XIV) and (15)(a) amended, (SB 14-132), ch. 179, p. 654, § 1, effective August 6; (1)(a)(XXV) and (1)(a)(XXVI) amended and (1)(a)(XXVII) and (28) added, (SB 14-041), ch. 321, p. 1402, § 1, effective August 6; (1)(a)(XXV) and (1)(a)(XXVI) amended and (1)(a)(XXVIII) and (29) added, (HB 14-1089), ch. 189, p. 706, § 2, effective August 6; (1)(b)(II)(I) added, (SB 14-030), ch. 263, p. 1056, § 1, effective August 6.

L. 2015:

(1)(h) added and (5)(a)(II) repealed, (HB 15-1026), ch. 231, p. 860, § 4, effective August 5.

L. 2017:

(18)(b)(II) amended, (HB 17-1149), ch. 102, p. 378, § 2, effective August 9.

L. 2018:

(1)(a)(XXIX) and (30) added, (HB 18-1244), ch. 358, p. 2122, § 2, effective August 8; (11)(b) and (11)(c) amended, (HB 18-1361), ch. 342, p. 2035, § 1, effective August 8.

L. 2019:

(1)(a)(XXVIII) and (1)(a)(XXIX) amended and (1)(a)(XXX) and (31) added, (SB 19-205), ch. 220, p. 2245, § 1, effective August 2.

42-3-214. Special plates - alumni associations - retirement.

The department shall issue one or more sets of special alumni license plates to applicants under this section for passenger cars or trucks that do not exceed sixteen thousand pounds empty weight. For the purposes of this section, recreational vehicles that do not exceed sixteen thousand pounds empty weight shall be classified as passenger cars.

An alumni association for a private or public college or university located within Colorado may apply directly to the department for the establishment of a special license plate for the alumni association. The department shall accept applications to establish special alumni license plates annually according to the schedule established by the department. An alumni association shall not apply for a license plate until the alumni association has commitments for license plate purchases from at least five hundred persons and provides a list of the names and addresses of such persons to the department.

An alumni association applying for the establishment of a special alumni license plate is responsible for all costs of designing such plate and shall pay such costs before the license plate is produced. Any design for a special alumni license plate shall conform with standards established by the department and shall be approved by the department.

For the purpose of this section, "college or university" means an institution of higher education that offers at least a bachelor degree in an educational program and that is accredited by a nationally recognized accrediting agency or association.

A person may apply for a special alumni license plate for a motor vehicle if the person pays the taxes and fees required under this section and provides the department or authorized agent a certificate issued by the alumni association confirming that such person meets the qualifications for the license plate established by the alumni association pursuant to paragraph (b) of this subsection (3). The department shall prepare a certificate form to be used by alumni associations when confirming that a person is eligible to obtain special alumni license plates.

An alumni association may establish the following qualifications to use the special alumni license plates:

Membership in the alumni association; or

Specified levels of contributions to the college or university.

(Deleted by amendment,

L. 2008, p. 1286

, § 1, effective May 27, 2008.)

An alumni association establishing qualifications to use special license plates shall set a one-time fee to qualify for the special license plates, which fee shall be used for the following purposes:

Scholarships for students attending the university or college; or

Support of academic programs at the university or college.

The amount of the taxes and fees for special alumni license plates under this section is the same as the amount of the taxes and fees specified for regular motor vehicle license plates plus a one-time fee of twenty-five dollars for each motor vehicle to issue or replace such license plates. The department shall transmit the additional one-time fee to the state treasurer, who shall credit the fee to the highway users tax fund for allocation and expenditure as specified in section 43-4-205 (5.5)(b), C.R.S.

An applicant may apply for personalized special alumni license plates. Upon payment of the additional fee required by section 42-3-211 (6)(a) for personalized license plates, the department may issue such plates if the applicant complies with section 42-3-211. If any applicant has existing personalized license plates for a motor vehicle, the applicant may transfer the combination of letters or numbers to a new set of special alumni license plates for the vehicle upon paying the fee imposed by section 42-3-211 (6)(a) and upon turning such existing plates in to the department as required by the department. A person who has obtained personalized special alumni license plates under this subsection (5) shall pay the annual fee imposed by section 42-3-211 (6)(b) for renewal of such personalized plates. The fees under this subsection (5) are in addition to all other taxes and fees imposed for the special alumni license plates.

Special alumni license plates shall be renewed in the same manner as other license plates under section 42-3-113 or, for personalized plates, under section 42-3-211.

The department shall retire the special alumni license plates authorized by this section unless the plates have been issued for at least five hundred vehicles by July 1, 2016. A person who was issued a special alumni license plate on or before July 1, 2016, may continue to use the plate after July 1, 2016.

Source:

L. 2005:

(4) amended, p. 144, § 13, effective April 5; entire article amended with relocations, p. 1124, § 2, effective August 8.

L. 2007:

(7) amended, p. 1986, § 2, effective June 1.

L. 2008:

IP(3)(b), (3)(b)(III), and (7) amended and (3)(c) added, p. 1286, § 1, effective May 27.

L. 2011:

(7) amended, (HB 11-1236), ch. 98, p. 286, § 2, effective April 8.

42-3-215. Special plates - United States olympic committee - retirement. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2005:

(4)(a) amended, p. 144, § 14, effective April 5; entire article amended with relocations, p. 1126, § 2, effective August 8.

L. 2013:

Entire section repealed, (SB 13-081), ch. 114, p. 390, § 2, effective April 8.

Editor's note:

This section was similar to former § 42-3-115.8 as it existed prior to 2005.

42-3-216. Special plates - Colorado foundation for agriculture and natural resources - definitions - retirement. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2005:

(5)(a) amended, p. 144, § 15, effective April 5; entire article amended with relocations, p. 1127, § 2, effective August 8.

L. 2007:

(7) amended, p. 1986, § 3, effective June 1.

L. 2013:

Entire section repealed, (SB 13-081), ch. 114, p. 391, § 3, effective April 8.

Editor's note:

This section was similar to former § 42-3-116.5 as it existed prior to 2005.